Arkansas, session 2025, HB1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-507(a)(2)-(3), concerning credited
service for an employee of the Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas
School for the Deaf, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) For periods of time prior to July 1, 1991, in no case
shall less than ten (10) days of service rendered by a member in any calendar
month be credited as a month of service, nor shall less than eleven (11)
months of service rendered by a member in any fiscal year be credited as a
year of service unless the member is was employed by the former Arkansas
School for the Blind, or the former Arkansas School for the Deaf, the state
colleges and universities, or the public schools of the state, in which case
nine (9) months would constitute a year of credited service.
*LJH122*
03-31-2025 12:28:11 LJH122

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1344
(B) For periods of time prior to July 1, 1991, in no case
can less than nine (9) months of service rendered in any fiscal year be
credited as a full year of service, nor shall more than one (1) year of
service be credited any member for all service rendered by him or her in a
fiscal year.
(3)(A) Beginning July 1, 1992, and thereafter, service rendered
by a member in any calendar month shall be credited as service based upon the
member's number of hours of service in that month and in accordance with the
following schedule:
Eighty (80) or more hours of service ............. One (1) month
Sixty (60) hours up to less than eighty
(80) hours ............. Three-fourths (¾) month
Forty (40) hours up to less than sixty
(60) hours ............. One-half (½) month
Twenty (20) hours up to less than forty
(40) hours ............. One-fourth (¼) month
Less than twenty (20) hours ............. No credit.
(B) Beginning July 1, 1991, in no case shall less than
eleven (11) months of service rendered by a member in any fiscal year be
credited as a full year of service, except that the minimum shall be lowered
to nine (9) months for a member whose covered employment is employment with
the former Arkansas School for the Blind, or the former Arkansas School for
the Deaf, the Arkansas School for the Deaf and Blind, the state colleges and
universities, or the public schools.
(C) Any member who retires on or after July 1, 1999, shall
receive six (6) months of service credit for each full semester of service
rendered in any fiscal year for covered employment with the former Arkansas
School for the Blind, or the former Arkansas School for the Deaf, the
Arkansas School for the Deaf and Blind, the state colleges and universities,
or the public schools of the state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-7-202(21)(A), concerning the definition
of "employment with a school" under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System,
is amended to read as follows:
(21) “Employment with a school” means, beginning July 1, 1993:
(A) Employment with any of the following institutions or
03-31-2025 12:28:11 LJH122

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1344
agencies:
(i) Former Arkansas School for the Blind;
(ii) Former Arkansas School for the Deaf;
(iii) Arkansas School for the Deaf and Blind;
(iii)(iv) Arkansas Activities Association;
(iv)(v) State Board of Education;
(v)(vi) Regional education service cooperatives; and
(vi)(vii) Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVENESS.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall become effective only if HB1810 of
the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly is enacted by the General Assembly and
becomes an act.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the merger of the Arkansas
School for the Blind and Arkansas School for the Deaf under HB1810 of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly cannot occur during the middle of a school
year; that if HB1810 of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly did go into effect
during the middle of a school year, there would be significant disruptions in
funding and confusion among administration, staff, students, and parents of
students; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the
necessary changes in implementing the merger of the Arkansas School for the
Blind and Arkansas School for the Deaf under HB1810 of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly are made consistent throughout the Arkansas Code and at the
same time that HB1810 of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly goes into effect
before the upcoming 2026 fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

03-31-2025 12:28:11 LJH122

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1344
/s/Warren



































03-31-2025 12:28:11 LJH122